Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201664-312
Electronic evidence of authenticity of notary public's electronic signature and electronic notary seal; form.

Electronic evidence of the authenticity of the notary public’s electronic signature and electronic notary seal of an electronic notary public of this state, if required, shall be attached to, or logically associated with, a document with a notary public’s electronic signature transmitted to another state or nation and shall be in the form of an electronic certificate of authority signed by the Secretary of State in conformance with any current and pertinent international treaties, agreements, and conventions subscribed to by the United States Government.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 12.
July 1, 2017